Hawaii statutes.
§466K-6 Appraisers in arbitration
proceedings; recordation; nonconfidentiality. (a) Arbitration awards,
records of awards, and supplementary, dissenting, or explanatory opinions
recorded pursuant to this section shall be public records.

(b) In an arbitration proceeding to determine
the fair market value, fair market rental, or fair and reasonable rent of real
property where the arbitrator is a real estate appraiser licensed or certified under
this chapter, the record of an award shall include but not be limited to
findings of fact; the state-licensed or certified appraiser's rationale for the
award; the state-licensed or certified appraiser's certification of compliance
with the most current Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice as approved
by the director; and information regarding the evidence, including the data,
methodologies, and analysis that provided the basis for the award.

(c) A real estate appraiser licensed or
certified under this chapter who is named or appointed as an arbitrator in a
submission agreement to appraise or arbitrate entered into after July 1, 2014,
shall record with the bureau of conveyances all arbitration awards; records of
awards, if separately issued; and any supplementary, dissenting, or explanatory
opinions on awards within ninety days of the notification of the determination
of the award to the parties.

(d) No agreement between the parties or the
appraisers acting as arbitrators shall preclude or deny the requirement to
record an award, the record of an award, or any supplementary, dissenting, or
explanatory opinions as required by this section.

(e) Failure to comply with this section shall
be a violation of this chapter for purposes of licensing or certification. [L
2011, c 227, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 73, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next